Maryland, session 2025, HB0707.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
11–128.
(a) “License”, as used in reference to the operation of a motor vehicle, means any:
(1) Driver’s license; and
– 1 –

Ch. 440 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) Any other license or permit to drive a motor vehicle that is issued under
or granted by the laws of this State, including:
(i) Any temporary license;
(ii) A learner’s instructional permit;
(iii) A provisional license;
(iv) The privilege of any individual to drive a motor vehicle, whether
or not that individual is formally licensed by this or any other jurisdiction;
(v) Any nonresident’s privilege to drive, as defined in this subtitle;
and
(vi) A commercial driver’s license.
(b) “License” does not include an electronic credential issued under Title 16,
Subtitle 10 of this article.
11–135.
(a) (1) “Motor vehicle” means, except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, a vehicle that:
(i) Is self–propelled or propelled by electric power obtained from
overhead electrical wires; and
(ii) Is not operated on rails.
(2) “Motor vehicle” includes a low speed vehicle.
(b) “Motor vehicle” does not include:
(1) A moped, as defined in § 11–134.1 of this subtitle;
(2) A motor scooter, as defined in § 11–134.5 of this subtitle;
(3) An electric bicycle, as defined in § 11–117.1 of this subtitle;
(4) An electric low speed scooter, as defined in § 11–117.2 of this subtitle;
or
(5) A personal delivery device, as defined in § 21–104.5 of this article.
12–306.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 440
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “NONAPPARENT DISABILITY” MEANS A
DISABILITY OR HEALTH CONDITION THAT IS NOT IMMEDIATELY OBVIOUS OR
VISIBLE.
(2) “NONAPPARENT DISABILITY” INCLUDES:
(I) DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES; AND
(II) INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES.
(B) AN INITIAL AND A RENEWAL APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE, AN
IDENTIFICATION CARD, OR A MOPED OPERATOR’S PERMIT SHALL ALLOW AN
APPLICANT TO CHOOSE TO INDICATE ON THE DOCUMENT THAT THE APPLICANT HAS
A NONAPPARENT DISABILITY.
(C) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL:
(1) ENSURE THAT THE LICENSE, IDENTIFICATION CARD, OR MOPED
OPERATOR’S PERMIT OF AN APPLICANT WHO HAS INDICATED A NONAPPARENT
DISABILITY ON AN APPLICATION INCLUDES A NOTATION OF THE NONAPPARENT
DISABILITY ON THE BOTTOM OF THE LICENSE, IDENTIFICATION CARD, OR MOPED
OPERATOR’S PERMIT;
(2) CONSULT WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY AND
INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY ADVOCACY GROUPS WITH RESPECT TO THE DESIGN OF
THE NONAPPARENT DISABILITY NOTATION;
(3) NOTIFY AN INDIVIDUAL WITH A NONAPPARENT DISABILITY
NOTATION ON A LICENSE, IDENTIFICATION CARD, OR MOPED OPERATOR’S PERMIT
THAT TURNS 18 YEARS OF AGE THAT THE INDIVIDUAL MAY REQUEST THAT THE
NONAPPARENT DISABILITY NOTATION BE REMOVED; AND
(4) DELETE ANY RECORD OF AN INDIVIDUAL’S NONAPPARENT
DISABILITY NOTATION ON REQUEST BY THE INDIVIDUAL AT ANY TIME; AND
(5) ESTABLISH PUBLIC OUTREACH EFFORTS TO EDUCATE THE
GENERAL PUBLIC ON THE AVAILABILITY OF THE NONAPPARENT DISABILITY
NOTATION.
(D) THERE IS NO FEE FOR A NONAPPARENT DISABILITY NOTATION ON A
LICENSE, IDENTIFICATION CARD, OR MOPED OPERATOR’S PERMIT, INCLUDING FOR
THE ISSUANCE OF A CORRECTED DOCUMENT IF NO OTHER CORRECTIONS ARE MADE.
– 3 –

Ch. 440 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(E) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY NOT:
(1) REQUIRE AN APPLICANT FOR A LICENSE, AN IDENTIFICATION
CARD, OR A MOPED OPERATOR’S PERMIT TO PROVIDE PROOF OF THE APPLICANT’S
NONAPPARENT DISABILITY;
(2) DENY AN APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE, AN IDENTIFICATION
CARD, OR A MOPED OPERATOR’S PERMIT BECAUSE THE NONAPPARENT DISABILITY
SELECTED BY THE APPLICANT DOES NOT MATCH THE NONAPPARENT DISABILITY
INDICATED ON ANOTHER DOCUMENT ASSOCIATED WITH THE APPLICANT;
(3) NOTWITHSTANDING § 4–320 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS
ARTICLE AND EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, DISCLOSE
FOR ANY USE WITHOUT A COURT ORDER INFORMATION RELATED TO AN
APPLICANT’S INDICATION:
(I) INDICATION OF A NONAPPARENT DISABILITY ON AN
APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE, AN IDENTIFICATION CARD, OR A MOPED OPERATOR’S
PERMIT FOR ANY USE IN RESPONSE TO A REQUEST FROM AN INSURANCE COMPANY
OR THE MARYLAND INSURANCE ADMINISTRATION; OR
(II) REQUEST TO REMOVE AN INDICATION OF A NONAPPARENT
DISABILITY FROM A LICENSE, AN IDENTIFICATION CARD, OR A MOPED OPERATOR’S
PERMIT; OR
(4) USE INFORMATION DISCLOSED BY A PERSON UNDER THIS
SECTION AS A BASIS FOR REFERRING THE PERSON TO THE MEDICAL ADVISORY
BOARD UNDER § 16–118 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(F) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY MAKE INFORMATION DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (E)(3) OF THIS SECTION AVAILABLE TO:
(1) A COURT;
(2) A CRIMINAL JUSTICE AGENCY;
(3) A DRIVER LICENSING AUTHORITY;
(4) THE APPLICANT;
(5) THE APPLICANT’S ATTORNEY;
(6) ANY THIRD PARTY DESIGNATED BY THE APPLICANT; OR
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 440
(7) THE CHILD SUPPORT ADMINISTRATION.
(G) THE MARYLAND POLICE TRAINING AND STANDARDS COMMISSION, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE AND OTHER
INTERESTED STAKEHOLDERS, SHALL IMMEDIATELY IMPLEMENT TRAINING
CONCERNING INTERACTIONS WITH INDIVIDUALS WHO HAVE A NONAPPARENT
DISABILITY NOTATION ON THEIR LICENSE, IDENTIFICATION CARD, OR MOPED
OPERATOR’S PERMIT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 5 –